California statutes. Education Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

90016.

The board shall issue revenue bonds and revenue bond anticipation notes in its name and as its obligation, but no bond or note issued or sold pursuant to this article shall be or become a lien, charge, or liability against the State of California or against the board or against the property or funds of either, except, in the case of revenue bonds, to the extent of the pledge of revenues or part of revenues of the project, as may be provided by the indenture pursuant to which revenue bonds are issued, and, in the case of notes, to the extent of the pledge of revenues of the project and proceeds of the sale of bonds, as may be provided in the resolution or indenture authorizing the issuance of the notes. Each of these bonds and notes issued by the board shall contain a recital on the face thereof, stating that neither the payment of the principal nor any part thereof, nor any interest thereon, constitutes a debt, liability, or obligation of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90017.

The board shall determine the time, form, and manner of the issuance of revenue bonds and revenue bond anticipation notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

90018.

The board may enter into indentures providing for the aggregate principal amount, date or dates, maturities, interest rates, denominations, form, registration, transfer and interchange of any revenue bonds and coupons issued pursuant to this article, and the terms and conditions on which the same shall be executed, issued, secured, sold, paid, redeemed, funded, and refunded. Reference on the face of the bonds to the indenture by its date of adoption, or the apparent date on the face thereof, is sufficient to incorporate all of the provisions thereof and of this article into the body of the bonds and their appurtenant coupons. Each taker and subsequent holder of the bonds or coupons, whether the coupons are attached to or detached from the bonds, has recourse to all of the provisions of the indenture and of this article, and is bound thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

90019.

An indenture pursuant to which bonds are issued may include any and all of the covenants and agreements on the part of the board as the board deems necessary or advisable for the better security of the bonds issued thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

90020.

An indenture may provide that payments of principal and interest of bonds shall be secured by all or by part of revenues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90021.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder requiring the board to pay or cause to be paid punctually the principal of all such bonds and the interest thereon on the date or dates, or at the place or places, and in the manner mentioned in such bonds and in the coupons appertaining thereto in accordance with such indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90022.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder, requiring the board to operate the project continuously, to the extent practicable under conditions as they may from time to time exist, in an efficient and economical manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90023.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder requiring the board to make all necessary repairs, renewals and replacements to any project, and to keep the project at all times in good repair, working order and condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90024.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder requiring the board to preserve and protect the security of the bonds and the rights of the holders thereof and to warrant and defend such rights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90025.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder requiring the board to pay and discharge or cause to be paid and discharged all lawful claims for labor, materials and supplies or other charges which, if unpaid, might become a lien or charge upon the revenues, or any part thereof, of any project acquired, constructed or completed from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds, or upon any physical properties, or which might impair the security of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90026.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder which limits, restricts, or prohibits any right, power or privilege of the board to mortgage or otherwise encumber, sell, lease or dispose of any improvements constructed from the proceeds of the bonds, or to enter into any lease or agreement which impairs or impedes the operation of a project, or any part thereof, necessary to secure adequate revenues or which otherwise impairs or impedes the rights of the holders of the bonds with respect to such revenues.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90027.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder requiring the board to fix, prescribe, and collect rates, rentals, or other charges in connection with the services and facilities furnished from the project acquired, constructed, or purchased from part or all of the proceeds of the bonds, or from the revenues securing the bonds, sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds as they become due and payable, together with additional sums that may be required for any fund created by this article, for the further security of the bonds or as a depreciation charge or other charge in connection with the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90028.

An indenture may include a clause relating to the bonds issued thereunder requiring the board to hold or cause to be held in trust the revenues or any part of revenues pledged to the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, or to any reserve or other fund created by this article for the further protection of the bonds, and to apply such revenues or any part of revenues or cause them to be applied only as provided in the indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90029.

An indenture may include a clause defining the power of the board in applying the proceeds of the sale of any issue of bonds for the acquiring, constructing, or completing of any project or any part thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90030.

An indenture may include a clause limiting the power of the board to issue additional bonds for the purpose of acquiring, constructing or completing any project or any part thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90031.

An indenture may include a clause requiring, specifying or limiting the kind, amount and character of insurance to be maintained by the board on any project, or any part thereof, and the use and disposition of the proceeds of any such insurance thereafter collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90032.

An indenture may include a clause providing the events of default and the terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds of the board then or thereafter issued may become or be declared due and payable prior to maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90033.

An indenture may include a clause designating the rights, limitations, powers and duties arising upon breach by the board of any of the covenants, conditions, or obligations contained in any indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90034.

An indenture may include a clause prescribing a procedure by which the terms and conditions of the indenture may be subsequently amended or modified with the consent of the board and the vote or written assent of the holders of a specified principal amount or specified proportion of the bonds issued and outstanding. The clause may provide for meetings of bondholders and for the manner in which the consent of the bondholders may be given. The clause shall specifically state the effect of the amendment or modification upon the rights of the holders of all of the bonds and interest coupons appertaining thereto, whether attached thereto or detached therefrom.

With respect to any clause providing for the modification or amendment of an indenture, the board may agree that bonds held by the Treasurer, the United States or any instrumentality thereof, or the State of California or any political subdivision thereof (including every municipal corporation, district, public corporation, board or agency of any kind or class) shall not be counted as outstanding bonds, or be entitled to vote or assent, but shall, nevertheless, be subject to any modification or amendment of this type.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

90035.

An indenture may include a clause or clauses providing for such other acts and matters as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order better to secure the bonds or to make the bonds more marketable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90036.

The State Treasurer shall act as trustee for the board and the holders of bonds issued hereunder, and the board may authorize the trustee to act on behalf of the holders of the bonds, or any stated percentage thereof, and to exercise and prosecute on behalf of the holders of the bonds such rights and remedies as may be available to the holders. The board may provide in the indenture for the deposit of all revenues received from the project with the trustee to be held in a separate account in the California State University Dormitory Revenue Fund created by this article. The money in the fund shall be disbursed only as provided in the indenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

90037.

The board shall prescribe the duties and powers of the trustee with respect to the issuance, authentication, sale and delivery of the bonds and the payment of principal and interest thereof, the redemption of the bonds, the registration and discharge from registration of the bonds, and the management of any sinking fund or other funds provided as security for the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

90038.

The board may provide for one or several issues of bonds and may issue bonds in series or may divide any issue into one or more divisions and fix different maturities or dates of those bonds, different rates of interest, or prescribe different terms and conditions for the bonds of the several series or divisions. It is not necessary that all bonds of the same authorized issue be of the same kind or character, have the same security, or be of the same interest rate, but the terms thereof shall in each case be provided for by the board, at or prior to the issue thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

90039.

Bonds may be issued as coupon bonds or as registered bonds. The board may provide for the interchange of coupon bonds for registered bonds and registered bonds for coupon bonds, and may provide that the bonds shall be registered as to principal only, or as to both principal and interest, or otherwise as the board may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

90040.

Bonds shall bear interest at a fixed or variable rate of not to exceed 12 percent per annum, payable in the time, form, and manner set forth in the indenture for the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90041.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 90013, 90040, and 90048, the rate of interest which bonds or notes may bear and the yield resulting to the purchaser thereof may exceed the maximum rates specified in said sections to the extent of any debt service grant applicable to such interest which the United States of America has agreed, pursuant to any federal statute, to pay with respect to the bonds or notes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90042.

Bonds may be callable upon any terms, conditions, and upon any notice as the board may determine, and upon the payment of the premium as may be fixed by the board in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds. No bond is subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless the right to exercise the call is expressly stated on the face of the bond.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

90043.

The board may provide for the payment of the principal and interest of bonds at any place within or without the State of California, and in specified coin or currency of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

90044.

The board may provide for the execution and authentication of bonds and notes by the manual, lithographed or printed facsimile signature of officers of the board and, in the case of bonds, by additional authentication by the Treasurer as trustee. If any of the officers whose signatures or countersignatures appear upon the notes, bonds or coupons cease to be officers before the delivery of the notes, bonds or coupons, their signatures or countersignatures are nevertheless valid and of the same force and effect as if the officers had remained in office until the delivery of the notes, bonds or coupons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

90045.

Bonds shall bear dates prescribed by the board. Bonds may be serial bonds or sinking fund bonds with those maturities as the board may determine. No bond by its terms shall mature in more than 50 years from its own date and, in the event any authorized issue is divided into two or more series or divisions, the maximum maturity date herein authorized shall be calculated from the date on the face of each bond separately, irrespective of the fact that different dates may be prescribed for the bonds of each separate series or division of any authorized issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

90046.

Immediately after the adoption of a resolution by the board directing the preparation of any bonds or notes authorized under this article, the Treasurer shall prepare the requisite number of suitable bonds or notes of the denominations, and in accordance with the specifications contained in such resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

90047.

When the bonds authorized to be issued under this article are duly executed, they shall be sold by the Treasurer, for cash, in those parcels and numbers as the Treasurer shall be directed by a resolution adopted by the board. Before offering any of the bonds for sale, the Treasurer shall detach therefrom all coupons, if any, that have matured or will mature before the day fixed for the sale. Bonds in the form of commercial paper notes shall be sold in the manner specified in the indenture for the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90048.

Bonds and notes may be sold at either public or private sale. The board may fix terms and conditions for the sale or other disposition of any authorized issue of bonds or notes. The Treasurer, when authorized by resolution of the board may sell bonds and notes at less than their par or face value, but no bond or note may be sold at a price below the par or face value thereof which would result in a sale price yielding to the purchaser an average of more than 12 percent per annum, payable semiannually, according to standard tables of bond values.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 21) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 321, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

90049.

The board may provide for the security of bonds. The board may use and expend all or any part of any funds or proceeds of any property owned by it, whether received by gift, appropriation or otherwise, if not restricted as to the use of such funds or proceeds of property by the terms of any gift or trust or provision of law for the redemption of bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this article and the payment of interest due thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90050.

All costs and expenses incident to the issuance and sale of notes may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the notes. All costs and expenses incident to the issuance and sales of bonds and all costs and expenses incident to the redemption of revenue bond anticipation notes retired with proceeds from the sale of the bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds. Interest on bonds may be paid out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds during the actual construction of any project for the acquisition, construction or completion of which the bonds have been issued, and for a period of not to exceed two (2) years thereafter as provided for in the indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90051.

The board may provide that notes or bonds and the interest thereon shall be secured by all or by part of revenues of a project upon the basis of which the notes or bonds are issued or authorized to be issued, and shall constitute a lien upon the revenues of the project as may be provided for in the notes or in any indenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

90052.

Pending the actual issuance or delivery of revenue bonds, the board may issue temporary or interim bonds, certificates or receipts of any denomination whatsoever, and with or without coupons, to be exchanged for definitive bonds when ready for delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

90053.

The board may provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated notes, bonds, and coupons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

90054.

Bonds and notes issued pursuant to the provisions of this article and the interest or income therefrom are exempt from all taxation in this state other than gift, inheritance and estate taxes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90055.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all notes and bonds hereafter sold and delivered pursuant to the provisions of this article are legal investments for all trust funds and for the funds of all insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, trust companies, and the state school funds, and may also be used as security for the deposit of public moneys in banks in this state. Such bonds are also legal investments for any public or private funds which may be invested in county, municipal or school district bonds, and may be deposited as security for the performance of any act whenever the bonds of any county, municipality or school district may be so deposited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90056.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds for the purpose of redeeming or retiring any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article. All provisions of this article applicable to the issuance of revenue bonds are applicable to the funding or refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale or exchange thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

90057.

Funding or refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide funds for the payment of all bonds to be funded or refunded thereby, and in addition for the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring or paying of such outstanding bonds, and the issuance of such funding or refunding bonds. These expenses include the difference in amount between the par value of the funding or refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the funding or refunding bonds are sold, any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest upon such funding or refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be funded or refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be funded or refunded will be paid pursuant to the call thereof or agreement with the holders thereof, and the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing thereon to the date of the call or retirement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90058.

All bonds and notes issued under the provisions of this article are negotiable instruments, except when registered in the name of a registered owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90059.

Before issuing any bond or bonds pursuant to the provisions of this article, the board shall by resolution declare the purpose for which the proceeds of the bonds proposed to be issued shall be expended and shall specify the maximum amount of bonds to be issued or sold for this purpose, and bonds shall not be issued or sold for this purpose in an amount exceeding that specified maximum except with the consent of bondholders, pursuant to amendment or modification of an indenture, as provided in Section 90034 of this article. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the board from amending any resolution of this type prior to the issuance of bonds authorized thereby to increase or decrease the maximum amount of bonds to be issued or sold. The issuance of bonds for one or more projects may be included in a single resolution of authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

90060.

The board has full charge of the acquisition, construction and completion of all projects authorized by them and may proceed with such work forthwith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90061.

The board may construct any project and acquire all property necessary therefor on such terms and conditions as it may deem advisable. When any part of the work is to be done or performed by any public body or by the United States jointly or in conjunction with the board, the portion of the cost thereof to be borne by the board may be turned over to the government of the United States or to any other public body to be expended by it in the acquisition, construction or completion of the project.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90062.

Title to all property acquired by the board and the revenues and income therefrom is in the State of California. The title to any moneys, revenues, sinking funds, reserve funds and other funds created by this article and the income thereof pledged to the payment of the principal or interest or any bonds issued thereunder is subject to trusts declared in favor of the bondholders. All such property, and the income therefrom, are exempt from all taxation by the State of California or by any county, city and county, city, district, political subdivision or public corporation thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90063.

At all times the operation, maintenance, control, repair, construction, reconstruction, alteration and improvement of any project are vested in the board subject to such authorized leases as may be permitted by any indenture.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90064.

The board may use for the payment of the costs of acquisition, construction or completion of any project any funds made available to the board by the State of California or any other funds provided by the board from any source, to be expended for the accomplishing of the purposes set forth in this article, together with the proceeds of revenue bonds and revenue bond anticipation notes issued and sold by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90065.

The board may insure against loss of revenues from any cause whatsoever and the proceeds of any insurance shall be used for the payment of bonds or notes and the interest thereon, or for other purposes as may be provided in an indenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 315, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

90066.

The board may insure against public liability or property damage. The board may provide in an indenture for the carrying of this or any other insurance in the amount and of the character as it shall determine, and for the payment of the premiums thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

90067.

When authorized by resolution of the board, as provided in this article, the State Treasurer shall prepare and procure the printing or engrossing of notes, bonds, coupons, indentures or other instruments and contracts or agreements of every kind required or convenient for or pertaining to the issuance or sale of notes or bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90068.

The board shall fix rents, charges and fees for all projects acquired, constructed or completed under the terms of this article for the use thereof by any persons utilizing the facilities thereof, subject to such contractual obligations as may be entered into by the board and the holders of notes and bonds issued under this article. The board is authorized to change rents, charges and fees from time to time, as conditions warrant. To the extent and in the manner provided in the indenture, all rents, charges and fees shall at all times be fixed to yield annual revenue equal to annual operating and maintenance expenses, including repairs and insurance costs and all redemption payments and interest charges and reserve fund requirements on revenue bonds at any time issued and outstanding hereunder, as the same become due.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90069.

Rent, charges, and fees collected in error may be refunded by the board in accordance with regulations prescribed by the board. Refunds of rent, charges, and fees collected for facilities requested by students and not utilized by them may be made for good cause by the board in such amounts and under such conditions as may be prescribed by regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90070.

The board may include in an indenture those limitations as to competitive projects, both as to location and comparative rentals, as may be deemed necessary or desirable for the security of revenue bonds issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

90071.

The board may also include in an indenture a covenant that no project acquired, constructed or completed from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall be used without charge therefor or any facilities thereof be furnished free of charge to any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

90072.

The holder of any bond or note issued pursuant to this article may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding require and compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon the board or upon any official or employee or assumed by any thereof, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, maintenance, repair, reconstruction or insurance of any project, or the collection, deposit, investment, application and disbursement of rents, rates, charges, fees and all other revenues derived from the operation and use of any project or in connection with the deposit, investment and disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of bonds and notes under this article. The enumeration of such rights and remedies does not, however, exclude the exercise or prosecution of any other rights or remedies available to the holders of bonds and notes issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90073.

The proceeds from the sale of all bonds and notes authorized under this article, except those proceeds used to redeem outstanding bonds or notes, shall be deposited forthwith by the Treasurer, on order of the Controller, in the State Treasury to the credit of a fund to be designated as the California State University Dormitory Construction Fund, which is hereby created. The money in the California State University Dormitory Construction Fund shall be expended, pursuant to claims filed by the board with the Controller, for the purposes authorized by this article, or as provided in the indenture or notes, and for any other purposes, subject to the restrictions provided by law, by the notes, or by the indenture, as may be authorized by resolution of the board. In carrying out these purposes, the money may be used to make loans to builders and developers for the establishment, acquisition, or construction of projects, to acquire leasehold interests in projects, or otherwise to provide funds for projects in any manner that the board may authorize by resolution. Moneys required to meet the costs of acquisition, construction, improvement, equipment, furnishing, financing, or refinancing of any project authorized by this article, and all costs incident thereto, shall be paid from the California State University Dormitory Construction Fund as provided in this article upon claim filed by the board and after audit by the Controller in the manner provided by law and upon warrants drawn by the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90074.

To the extent and in the manner provided in the indenture or in a resolution authorizing the issuance of notes, all revenues received from the operation of any project acquired or constructed by the board under the provisions of this article shall be transmitted by the board at least once in every calendar month, to the Treasurer. On order of the Controller, the Treasurer shall deposit the revenues in the State Treasury to the credit of the California State University Dormitory Revenue Fund, which fund is hereby created. Moneys in the California State University Dormitory Revenue Fund shall be used to pay the costs of operation and maintenance of the projects authorized by this article, including refunds authorized by Section 90069, to provide the amounts required for interest and redemption of notes and bonds as provided in this article, and for any other purposes authorized by resolution of the board, subject to any restrictions provided by law, a resolution authorizing the issuance of notes, or the indenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

90075.

For the payment of the principal and interest of the notes and bonds authorized to be issued under this article, an interest and redemption fund in the State Treasury is hereby created, to be designated the California State University Dormitory Interest and Redemption Fund. From the money deposited in the California State University Dormitory Construction Fund, the Treasurer, on order of the Controller, shall transfer to the California State University Dormitory Interest and Redemption Fund the sums required to pay the interest as it becomes due on all notes and bonds sold and outstanding for the construction or acquisition of a particular project authorized under this article during the period of actual construction or acquisition thereof and during the period thereafter as may be provided in the indenture or authorized by resolution of the board. The Treasurer, on order of the Controller, shall thereafter transfer from the California State University Dormitory Revenue Fund to the California State University Dormitory Interest and Redemption Fund the sums required to pay the interest on the notes and bonds and redeem the principal thereof as the interest payments and note and bond redemptions fall due for all notes and bonds issued under the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

90076.

Any balance remaining in any of the funds created by this article after payment of all costs, expenses, and charges authorized to be expended therefrom, may be allocated and used for other purposes incidental to the acquisition, construction, furnishing, equipping, operation and maintenance of such projects authorized under the provisions of this article as the board may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

90077.

Moneys in the California State University Dormitory Construction Fund may be invested by the board subject only to limitations which may be provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue bond anticipation notes or in any indenture providing for the issuance of revenue bonds. All securities or other investments made under the provisions of this article shall be held by the Treasurer as custodian thereof. All interest or other earnings received pursuant to the investments shall be collected by the Treasurer, and, on order of the Controller, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the fund from which interest or other earnings are derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 740, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

90078.

After all of the notes and revenue bonds shall have been fully paid and discharged, or provision for their payment and discharge irrevocably made, any surplus moneys in the California State University Dormitory Construction Fund shall, subject to the limitations and restrictions in any resolution authorizing the issuance of the notes or in any indenture providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds, remain available for the acquisition of sites for, and for the construction, equipping and furnishing of, buildings for the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

90079.

All money in the funds created by the provisions of this article is hereby appropriated for expenditure in carrying out the purposes herein provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90080.

The article shall be liberally construed to carry out the objects and purposes and the declared policy of the State of California as in this article set forth.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

90081.

An action may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to determine the validity of bonds issued, or any financing contract entered into, by the board for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

90082.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the State College Dormitory Building Maintenance and Equipment Reserve Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the State College Dormitory Building Maintenance and Equipment Reserve Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This section does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the State College Dormitory Building Maintenance and Equipment Reserve Fund was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 3.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

90083.

The board may pledge revenues received in accordance with Section 89770 to secure bonds issued in accordance with this article for capital expenditures, as defined in Section 89770, or for projects, as defined in Section 90011, and may pay all costs and expenses incident to the issuance and sale of the bonds, including, but not limited to, capitalized interested on bonds, from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 25.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Affordable Student Housing [90085. - 90089.]

90085.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to provide for affordable student housing on the campuses of the California State University.

Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that priority for construction of affordable student housing shall be given to campuses where there is no on campus student housing and a large proportion of the student population have low-income disadvantaged backgrounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1125, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

90086.

The following terms wherever used or referred to in this article shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University.

(b) “Campus” means any of the institutions included within the California State University, as specified in Section 89001.

(c) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California State University.

(d) “Project” means any one or more low-cost dormitories or other housing facilities, both onsite and offsite, to be constructed, furnished, equipped, and operated by the trustees pursuant to this article for use by students of any one or more of the campuses.
